Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
B. Consolidation

§ 17-19-1110.
Approval of plan of consolidation.

Subject to the limitations set forth in W.S.

17-19-1111

, one (1) or more nonprofit corporations may consolidate into a new business or nonprofit corporation, if the plan of consolidation is approved as provided in W.S.

17-19-1112

.

The plan of consolidation shall set forth:

The name of each corporation planning to consolidate and the name of the new corporation into which each plans to consolidate which is hereinafter designated as the new corporation;

The terms and conditions of the planned consolidation;

The manner and basis, if any, of converting the memberships of each public benefit or religious corporation into memberships of the new corporation;

If the consolidation involves a mutual benefit corporation, the manner and basis, if any, of converting memberships of each consolidating corporation into memberships, obligations or securities of the new corporation or into cash or other property in whole or part; and

With respect to the new corporation, all of the statements required to be set forth in articles of incorporation for corporations organized under this act.

The plan of consolidation may set forth other provisions relating to the planned consolidation.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1; 2008, ch. 116, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

made stylistic changes.

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (b)(v), see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxvii).

§ 17-19-1111.
Limitations on consolidations by public benefit or religious corporations.

Without the prior approval of the district court in a proceeding which the secretary of state has been given written notice, a public benefit or religious corporation may consolidate only with:

A public benefit or religious corporation;

A foreign corporation that would qualify under this act as a public benefit or religious corporation;

A wholly-owned foreign or domestic business or mutual benefit corporation, provided the new corporation is and will continue to be a public benefit or religious corporation;

A governmental subdivision; or

A business or mutual benefit corporation, provided that:

On or prior to the effective date of the consolidation, assets with a value equal to the greater of the fair market value of the net tangible and intangible assets, including goodwill, of the public benefit corporation or the fair market value of the public benefit corporation if it were to be operated as a business concern are transferred or conveyed to one (1) or more persons who would have received its assets under W.S. 17-19-1406(a)(v) and (vi) had it dissolved;

It shall return, transfer or convey any assets held by it upon condition requiring return, transfer or conveyance, which condition occurs by reason of the consolidation, in accordance with the condition; and

The consolidation is approved by a majority of directors of each public benefit or religious corporation who are not and will not become members or shareholders in or officers, employees, agents or consultants of the new corporation.

At least twenty (20) days before consummation of any consolidation of a public benefit corporation or a religious corporation pursuant to paragraph (a)(v) of this section, notice including a copy of the proposed plan of consolidation, shall be delivered to the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall give notice of the proposed plan to the attorney general.

Without the prior written consent of the attorney general or of the district court in a proceeding in which the attorney general has been given notice, no member of a public benefit or religious corporation may receive or keep anything as a result of a consolidation other than a membership or membership in the new public benefit or religious corporation. The court shall approve the transaction if it is in the public interest.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a)(ii), see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxvii).

§ 17-19-1112.
Action on plan by board, members and third persons.

Unless this act, the articles, bylaws or the board of directors or members, acting pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, require a greater vote or voting by class, a plan of consolidation to be adopted shall be approved:

By the board;

By the members, if any, by two-thirds (2/3) of the votes cast or a majority of the voting power, whichever is less; and

In writing by any person or persons whose approval is required by a provision of the articles authorized by W.S.

17-19-1030

for an amendment to the articles or bylaws.

If a corporation party to a consolidation does not have members, the consolidation shall be approved by a majority of the directors in office at the time the consolidation is approved. In addition the corporation shall provide notice of any directors’ meeting at which such approval is to be obtained in accordance with W.S. 17-19-822(c). The notice shall also state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the proposed consolidation.

Each board may condition its submission of the proposed consolidation, and the members may condition their approval of the consolidation, on receipt of a higher percentage of affirmative votes or on any other basis.

If each board seeks to have the plan approved by the members at a membership meeting, each corporation shall give notice to its members of the proposed membership meeting in accordance with W.S.

17-19-705

. The notice shall also state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the plan of consolidation and contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the plan. The copy or summary of the plan for members of the corporations involved shall include any provision that, if contained in a proposed amendment to the articles of incorporation or bylaws, would entitle members to vote on the provision. The copy or summary of the plan for members of the disappearing corporation or corporations shall include a copy or summary of the articles and bylaws that will be in effect immediately after the consolidation takes effect.

If each board seeks to have the plan approved by the members by written consent or written ballot, the material soliciting the approval shall contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the plan. The copy or summary of the plan for members of the new corporation shall include any provision that, if contained in a proposed amendment to the articles of incorporation or bylaws, would entitle members to vote on the provision. The copy or summary of the plan for members of the disappearing corporation or corporations shall include a copy or summary of the articles and bylaws that will be in effect immediately after the consolidation takes effect.

Voting by a class of members is required on a plan of consolidation if the plan contains a provision that, if contained in a proposed amendment to articles of incorporation or bylaws, would entitle the class of members to vote as a class on the proposed amendment under W.S.

17-19-1004

or

17-19-1022

. The plan is approved by a class of members by two-thirds (2/3) of the votes cast by the class or a majority of the voting power of the class, whichever is less.

After a consolidation is adopted, and at any time before articles of consolidation are filed, the planned consolidation may be abandoned, subject to any contractual rights, without further action by members or other persons who approved the plan in accordance with the procedure set forth in the plan of consolidation or, if none is set forth, in the manner determined by the board of directors.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the introductory language of subsection (a), see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxvii).

§ 17-19-1113.
Articles of consolidation.

After a plan of consolidation is approved by the board of directors, and if required by W.S.

17-19-1112

, by the members and any other persons, the new corporation shall deliver to the secretary of state articles of consolidation setting forth:

The plan of consolidation;

If approval of members was not required, a statement to that effect and a statement that the plan was approved by a sufficient vote of the board of directors;

If approval by members was required:

The designation, number of memberships outstanding, number of votes entitled to be cast by each class entitled to vote separately on the plan, and number of votes of each class indisputably voting on the plan; and

Either the total number of votes cast for and against the plan by each class entitled to vote separately on the plan or the total number of undisputed votes cast for the plan by each class and a statement that the number cast for the plan by each class was sufficient for approval by that class.

If approval of the plan by some person or persons other than the members or the board is required pursuant to W.S.

17-19-1112

(a)(iii), a statement that the approval was obtained.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 17-19-1114.
Effect of consolidation.

When a consolidation takes effect:

Every other corporation party to the consolidation consolidates into the new corporation and the separate existence of every corporation except the new corporation ceases;

The title to all real estate and other property owned by each corporation party to the consolidation is vested in the new corporation without reversion or impairment subject to any and all conditions to which the property was subject prior to the consolidation;

The new corporation has all liabilities and obligations of each corporation party to the consolidation;

A proceeding pending against any corporation party to the consolidation may be continued as if the consolidation did not occur or the new corporation may be substituted in the proceeding for the corporation whose existence ceased; and

The articles of incorporation and bylaws of the new corporation are amended to the extent provided in the plan of consolidation.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 17-19-1115.
Consolidation with foreign corporation.

Except as provided in W.S.

17-19-1111

, one (1) or more foreign business or nonprofit corporations may consolidate with one (1) or more domestic nonprofit corporations if:

The consolidation is permitted by the law of the state or country under whose law each foreign corporation is incorporated and each foreign corporation complies with that law in effecting the consolidation;

The foreign corporation complies with W.S.

17-19-1113

if it is the new corporation of the consolidation; and

Each domestic nonprofit corporation complies with the applicable provisions of W.S.

17-19-1110

through

17-19-1112

and, if it is the new corporation of the consolidation, with W.S.

17-19-1113

.

Upon the consolidation taking effect, the new foreign business or nonprofit corporation is deemed to have irrevocably appointed the secretary of state as its agent for service of process in any proceeding brought against it.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1; 2000, ch. 48, § 2.

§ 17-19-1116.
Bequests, devises and gifts.

Any bequest, devise, gift, grant or promise contained in a will or other instrument of donation, subscription or conveyance, that is made to a constituent corporation and that takes effect or remains payable after the consolidation, inures to the new corporation unless the will or other instrument otherwise specifically provides.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-1117.
Consolidation with a governmental subdivision.

Except for W.S.

17-19-1111

, this article does not apply if a public benefit, mutual benefit or religious corporation consolidates with a governmental subdivision. The corporation shall file notice with the secretary of state of the consummated consolidation.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.